apertium-mt-he.he.dix
    <pardef n="פדלא/ה__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ת</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="כס__n_m">
      <!-- TODO complete pardef -->
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="גיא__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיי</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותייך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="אש/ך__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כנו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ככם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ככן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כה</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כים</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיים</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיי</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כינו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כייך</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיכם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיכן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיהן</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיו</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיה</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כיהם</l><r>ך<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="בלו/אים__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>אים</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יים</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אי</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יי</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איי</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יי</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אינו</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יינו</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איך</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייך</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>אייך</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייך</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איכם</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייכם</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איכן</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איהן</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייכן</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייהן</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איו</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייו</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איה</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייה</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>איהם</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייהם</l><r>אים<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="דיברטימנט/ו__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r>ו<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="כימשון"><par n="ה"/><i>כימשון</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דיברטימנטו"><par n="ה"/><i>דיברטימנט</i><par n="דיברטימנט/ו__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שפל"><par n="ה"/><i>שפל</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מנוס"><par n="ה"/><i>מנוס</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מנוד"><par n="ה"/><i>מנוד</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משוא"><par n="ה"/><i>משוא</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אשך"><par n="ה"/><i>אש</i><par n="אש/ך__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דוחן"><par n="ה"/><i>דוחן</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בלואים"><par n="ה"/><i>בלו</i><par n="בלו/אים__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כס"><par n="ה"/><i>כס</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיקחון"><par n="ה"/><i>פיקחון</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מסתורין"><par n="ה"/><i>מסתורין</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיעור"><par n="ה"/><i>סיעור</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיא"><par n="ה"/><i>גיא</i><par n="גיא__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בצע"><par n="ה"/><i>בצע</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ארגמן"><par n="ה"/><i>ארגמן</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צפי"><par n="ה"/><i>צפי</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טיס"><par n="ה"/><i>טיס</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קטל"><par n="ה"/><i>קטל</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="רצח"><par n="ה"/><i>רצח</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מועל"><par n="ה"/><i>מועל</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קימחון"><par n="ה"/><i>קימחון</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ירי"><par n="ה"/><i>ירי</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נועם"><par n="ה"/><i>נועם</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ידע"><par n="ה"/><i>ידע</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הלוך"><par n="ה"/><i>הלוך</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פוסטמה"><par n="ה"/><i>פוסטמ</i><par n="פדלא/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פדלאה"><par n="ה"/><i>פדלא</i><par n="פדלא/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הרג"><par n="ה"/><i>הרג</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הרף"><par n="ה"/><i>הרף</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הרס"><par n="ה"/><i>הרס</i><par n="כס__n_m"/></e>
